Missouri, session 2026, HB2053.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 78, 79, and 80, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto nine new
sections, to be known as sections 78.650, 78.655, 78.660, 79.650, 79.655, 79.660, 80.562,
80.564, and 80.566, to read as follows:
78.650. 1. The holder of any elective office in a city of the third classification
with an optional form of government organized under this chapter may be removed by
the qualified voters of such city by recall petition in accordance with the procedure set
out in sections 78.650 to 78.660 subject to the following limitations:
(1) The officer has held office for at least six months;
(2) More than one recall petition may be filed for each officer but not less than
six months after voter disapproval of the officer's most recent recall petition; and
(3) The recalled officer shall not be a candidate for a special election held to fill
the vacancy created by such officer's recall, nor shall such recalled officer be appointed
by the appointing authority to fill the vacancy.
2. (1) A petition demanding the recall of an individual from elective office shall
be signed by voters entitled to vote for a successor to the incumbent sought to be
recalled, equal in number to at least twenty-five percent of the total number of
registered voters in such city eligible to vote for such successor. The signatures to the
petition need not all be appended to one paper but each signer shall include with the
signature the street and number of the signer's place of residence and the date signed.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2053 2
(2) Such petition for recall shall be filed with the election authority of the county
in which the city is located within sixty days after the date of the earliest signature on
the petition.
(3) One of the signers of each such petition shall swear or affirm before an
officer competent to administer oaths that the statements made in the petition are true
as such signer believes and that each signature appended to the petition is the genuine
signature of the individual whose name such signature purports to be.
(4) Such petition shall contain a statement of the reasons for which recall is
sought, which shall not be more than two hundred words in length. The authorized
reasons for recall are misconduct in office, incompetence, or failure to perform duties
prescribed by law.
78.655. 1. Within ten days after the date of filing such recall petition, the election
authority of the county in which such city is located shall examine and ascertain from
the voters' register whether the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters. If
necessary, the board of alders shall allow the election authority extra help for such
purpose. The election authority shall attach the election authority's certificate showing
the result of the examination to the petition.
2. If, by the election authority's certificate, the petition is shown to be
insufficient, the petition may be amended within ten days after the date of the
certificate. The election authority shall, within ten days after such amendment, conduct
a similar examination of the amended petition. If the election authority certifies that the
amended petition is insufficient, the petition shall be returned to the individual filing the
petition, without prejudice to the filing of a new petition to the same effect.
3. If the petition is deemed to be sufficient, the election authority shall submit the
petition to the board of alders without delay, and the board of alders shall order the
question to be submitted to the voters of the city.
78.660. 1. A special election shall be held on the recall petition as soon as
practicable and as may be determined by the election authority.
2. The question to be submitted to the voters at such election shall be in
substantially the following form:
(cid:0) FOR the removal of ______ (name of officer) from the
office of ______ (title of office)
(cid:0) AGAINST the removal of ______ (name of officer) from
the office of ______ (title of office)
3. If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question at such election
vote for the removal of such officer, a vacancy shall exist in such office. If a majority of
the qualified electors voting on the question at such election vote against the removal of

HB 2053 3
such officer, such officer shall continue to serve during the term for which such officer is
elected.
79.650. 1. The holder of any elective office in a city of the fourth classification
may be removed by the qualified voters of such city by recall petition in accordance with
the procedure set out in sections 79.650 to 79.660 subject to the following limitations:
(1) The officer has held office for at least six months;
(2) In the case of an office for a term of two years only, one recall petition may be
filed during such term;
(3) For a term of office more than two years, additional recall petitions may be
filed but not less than six months after voter disapproval of the officer's most recent
recall petition; and
(4) The recalled officer shall not be a candidate for a special election held to fill
the vacancy created by such officer's recall, nor shall such recalled officer be appointed
by the appointing authority to fill the vacancy.
2. (1) A petition demanding the recall of an individual from elective office shall
be signed by voters entitled to vote for a successor to the incumbent sought to be
recalled, equal in number to at least twenty-five percent of the total number of
registered voters in such city eligible to vote for such successor. The signatures to the
petition need not all be appended to one paper but each signer shall include with the
signature the street and number of the signer's place of residence and the date signed.
(2) Such petition for recall shall be filed with the election authority of the county
in which the city is located within sixty days after the date of the earliest signature on
the petition.
(3) One of the signers of each such petition shall swear or affirm before an
officer competent to administer oaths that the statements made in the petition are true
as such signer believes and that each signature appended to the petition is the genuine
signature of the individual whose name such signature purports to be.
(4) Such petition shall contain a statement of the reasons for which recall is
sought, which shall not be more than two hundred words in length. The authorized
reasons for recall are misconduct in office, incompetence, or failure to perform duties
prescribed by law.
79.655. 1. Within ten days after the date of filing such recall petition, the election
authority of the county in which such city is located shall examine and ascertain from
the voters' register whether the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters. If
necessary, the board of alders shall allow the election authority extra help for such
purpose. The election authority shall attach the election authority's certificate showing
the result of the examination to the petition.

HB 2053 4
2. If, by the election authority's certificate, the petition is shown to be
insufficient, the petition may be amended within ten days after the date of the
certificate. The election authority shall, within ten days after such amendment, conduct
a similar examination of the amended petition. If the election authority certifies that the
amended petition is insufficient, the petition shall be returned to the individual filing the
petition, without prejudice to the filing of a new petition to the same effect.
3. If the petition is deemed to be sufficient, the election authority shall submit the
petition to the board of alders without delay, and the board of alders shall order the
question to be submitted to the voters of the city.
79.660. 1. A special election shall be held on the recall petition as soon as
practicable and as may be determined by the election authority.
2. The question to be submitted to the voters at such election shall be in
substantially the following form:
(cid:0) FOR the removal of ______ (name of officer) from the
office of ______ (title of office)
(cid:0) AGAINST the removal of ______ (name of officer) from
the office of ______ (title of office)
3. If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question at such election
vote for the removal of such officer, a vacancy shall exist in such office. If a majority of
the qualified electors voting on the question at such election vote against the removal of
such officer, such officer shall continue to serve during the term for which such officer is
elected.
80.562. 1. The holder of any elective office in a village may be removed by the
qualified voters of such village by recall petition in accordance with the procedure set
out in sections 80.562 to 80.566 subject to the following limitations:
(1) The officer has held office for at least six months;
(2) More than one recall petition may be filed for each officer but not less than
six months after voter disapproval of the officer's most recent recall petition; and
(3) The recalled officer shall not be a candidate for a special election held to fill
the vacancy created by such officer's recall, nor shall such recalled officer be appointed
by the appointing authority to fill the vacancy.
2. (1) A petition demanding the recall of an individual from elective office shall
be signed by voters entitled to vote for a successor to the incumbent sought to be
recalled, equal in number to at least twenty-five percent of the total number of
registered voters in such village eligible to vote for such successor. The signatures to the
petition need not all be appended to one paper but each signer shall include with the
signature the street and number of the signer's place of residence and the date signed.

HB 2053 5
(2) Such petition for recall shall be filed with the election authority of the county
in which the village is located within sixty days after the date of the earliest signature on
the petition.
(3) One of the signers of each such petition shall swear or affirm before an
officer competent to administer oaths that the statements made in the petition are true
as such signer believes and that each signature appended to the petition is the genuine
signature of the individual whose name such signature purports to be.
(4) Such petition shall contain a statement of the reasons for which recall is
sought, which shall not be more than two hundred words in length. The authorized
reasons for recall are misconduct in office, incompetence, or failure to perform duties
prescribed by law.
80.564. 1. Within ten days after the date of filing such recall petition, the election
authority of the county in which such village is located shall examine and ascertain from
the voters' register whether the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters. If
necessary, the board of trustees shall allow the election authority extra help for such
purpose. The election authority shall attach the election authority's certificate showing
the result of the examination to the petition.
2. If, by the election authority's certificate, the petition is shown to be
insufficient, the petition may be amended within ten days after the date of the
certificate. The election authority shall, within ten days after such amendment, conduct
a similar examination of the amended petition. If the election authority certifies that the
amended petition is insufficient, the petition shall be returned to the individual filing the
petition, without prejudice to the filing of a new petition to the same effect.
3. If the petition is deemed to be sufficient, the election authority shall submit the
petition to the board of trustees without delay, and the board of trustees shall order the
question to be submitted to the voters of the village.
80.566. 1. A special election shall be held on the recall petition as soon as
practicable and as may be determined by the election authority.
2. The question to be submitted to the voters at such election shall be in
substantially the following form:
(cid:0) FOR the removal of ______ (name of officer) from the
office of ______ (title of office)
(cid:0) AGAINST the removal of ______ (name of officer) from
the office of ______ (title of office)
3. If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question at such election
vote for the removal of such officer, a vacancy shall exist in such office. If a majority of
the qualified electors voting on the question at such election vote against the removal of

HB 2053 6
such officer, such officer shall continue to serve during the term for which such officer is
elected.
✔